Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-148.10
Digital asset depository institution; investment; conditions.

Any financial institution as defined in section 8-3003 other than a digital asset depository institution as defined in section 8-3003 may invest not more than ten percent of its capital and surplus either in stock of a corporation operating a digital asset depository institution or directly, alone, or with others, in a digital asset depository institution. With written approval of the director, such additional percentage of its capital and surplus may be so invested as the director shall approve. Such investment is not subject to sections 8-148, 8-149, and 8-150.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 39.